Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.335

Teacher preparation degree and certificate programs—Needs assessment.

As part of the state needs assessment process conducted by the *board in accordance with **RCW 28B.76.230, the *board shall, in collaboration with the professional educator standards board, assess the need for additional degree and certificate programs in Washington that specialize in teacher preparation to meet regional or subject area shortages. If the *board determines that there is a need for additional programs, then the *board shall encourage the appropriate institutions of higher education or institutional sectors to create such a program.

[ 2010 c 235 s 507; 2007 c 396 s 17.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The higher education coordinating board was abolished by 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 301, effective July 1, 2012.

**(2) RCW 28B.76.230 was recodified as RCW 28B.77.080 pursuant to 2012 c 229 s 904.

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.

Captions not law—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.305.215.

Finding—Intent—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.188.020.